src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vedaei_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vedäi: # Noun 'driver'
     vedäi+N+Sg+Abe: vedäjata
     vedäi+N+Sg+Abl: vedäjalpäi
     vedäi+N+Sg+Acc: [vedäi, vedäjan]
     vedäi+N+Sg+Add1: [vedäjahapäi, vedäjhapäi] #CHECKME
     vedäi+N+Sg+Add2: vedäjalepäi
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ade: vedäjal
     vedäi+N+Sg+All: vedäjale
     vedäi+N+Sg+Apr1: vedäjanno
     vedäi+N+Sg+Apr2: vedäjannoks
     vedäi+N+Sg+Com: vedäjanke
     vedäi+N+Sg+Egr: vedäjannopäi
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ela: vedäjaspäi
     vedäi+N+Sg+EssInst: vedäjan
     vedäi+N+Sg+Gen: vedäjan
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ill: [vedäjaha, vedäjha] #CHECKME
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ine: vedäjas
     vedäi+N+Sg+Nom: vedäi
     vedäi+N+Sg+Par: vedäjad
     vedäi+N+Sg+Prl: vedäjadme
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ter1: [vedäjahasai, vedäjhasai] #CHECKME
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ter2: vedäjalesai
     vedäi+N+Sg+Ter3: vedäjassai
     vedäi+N+Sg+Tra: vedäjaks

     vedäi+N+Pl+Abe: vedäjita
     vedäi+N+Pl+Abl: vedäjilpäi
     vedäi+N+Pl+Acc: vedäjad 
     vedäi+N+Pl+Add1: vedäjihepäi
     vedäi+N+Pl+Add2: vedäjilepäi
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ade: vedäjil
     vedäi+N+Pl+All: vedäjile
     vedäi+N+Pl+Apr1: vedäjidenno
     vedäi+N+Pl+Apr2: vedäjidennoks
     vedäi+N+Pl+Com: vedäjidenke
     vedäi+N+Pl+Egr: vedäjidennopäi
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ela: vedäjišpäi
     vedäi+N+Pl+EssInst: vedäjin
     vedäi+N+Pl+Gen: vedäjiden
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ill: vedäjihe
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ine: vedäjiš
     vedäi+N+Pl+Nom: vedäjad
     vedäi+N+Pl+Par: vedäjid
     vedäi+N+Pl+Prl: vedäjidme
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ter1: vedäjihesai
     vedäi+N+Pl+Ter2: vedäjilesai
#     vedäi+N+Pl+Ter3: vedäjassai
     vedäi+N+Pl+Tra: vedäjikš
